Louisiana, session 2026, HB139.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9097.44 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9097.44. Parkview Oaks Crime Prevention and Improvement District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of East Baton Rouge, as more
specifically provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate
which shall be known as the Parkview Oaks Crime Prevention and Improvement
District, referred to in this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political
subdivision of the state as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The district shall include all property shown on the final subdivision plats
for Parkview Oaks lots A & B and lots 1 thru 89 and lots 91 thru 121, Parkview Oaks
East lots 1 thru 64 and lots 70 thru 77 and Parkview Oaks South lots 1 thru 247 and
Sherwood Oaks lots 1 thru 231 final filings filed with the East Baton Rouge Parish
Clerk of Court and as shown within the following boundaries:
For Parkview Oaks subdivision: Beginning near the intersection of
Parkmount Boulevard and Sherwood Forest Boulevard at the southwest corner of Lot
B proceed north along the western boundary lines to the northwest corner of lot A.
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
From the northwest corner of lot A proceed east along the northern boundary lines
to the northeast corner of lot A. From the northeast corner of lot A proceed north
along the western boundary line to the northwest corner of lot 52. From the
northwest corner of lot 52 proceed east along the north boundary line to the northeast
corner of lot 63. From the northeast corner of lot 63 proceed south along the eastern
boundary line to the northwest corner of lot 12. From the northwest corner of lot 12
proceed east along the northern boundary lines to the northeast corner of lot 113.
From the northeast corner of lot 113 proceed south along the eastern boundary lines
to the southeast corner of lot 121. From the southeast corner of lot 121 proceed west
to the southwest corner of lot 104. From the southwest corner of lot 104 proceed
south to the southeast corner of lot 89. From the southeast corner of lot 89 proceed
west along the southern boundary line to the southwest corner of lot 76. From the
southwest corner of lot 76 proceed north along the west boundary line to the
southeast corner of lot B. From the southeast corner of lot B proceed west along the
southern boundary line to the southwest corner of lot B.
For Parkview Oaks East subdivision: Beginning at the northwest corner of
lot 16 proceed east along the north boundary line to the northeast corner of lot 21.
From the northeast corner of lot 21 proceed south along the eastern boundary line to
the southeast corner of lot 65. From the southeast corner of lot 65 proceed west
along the southern boundary line to the southwest corner of lot 65. From the
southwest corner of lot 65 proceed north to the northwest corner of lot 65. From the
northwest corner of lot 65 proceed west to the northeast corner of lot 73. From the
northeast corner of lot 73 proceed south to the southeast corner of lot 70. From the
southeast corner of lot 70 proceed west along the southern boundary line to the
southwest corner of lot 70. From the southwest corner of lot 70 proceed north along
the western boundary line to the northwest corner of lot 72. From the northwest
corner of lot 72 proceed west along the southern boundary line to the southwest
corner of lot 77. From the southwest corner of lot 77 proceed north along the
western boundary lines to the northwest corner of lot 16.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
For Parkview Oaks South subdivision: From the northwest corner of lot 94
proceed east to the northeast corner of lot 183 along the northern boundary lines.
From the northeast corner of lot 183 proceed south along the east boundary lines to
the southeast mid point of lot 18. From the southeast midpoint of lot 18 proceed
west along the southern boundary line to the southwest corner of lot 17. From the
southwest corner of lot 17 proceed south along the east boundary line to the
southeast corner of lot 241. From the southeast corner of lot 241 proceed west along
the southern boundary line to the southwest corner of lot 247. From the southwest
corner of lot 247 proceed north along the western boundary line to the northwest
corner of lot 233. From the northwest corner of lot 233 proceed west along the
southern boundary lines to the southwest corner of lot 228. From the southwest
corner of lot 228 proceed north along the western boundary lines to the northwest
corner of lot 221. From the northwest corner of lot 221 proceed east to the northeast
corner of lot 213. From the northeast corner of lot 213 proceed north along the
western boundary lines to the southeast corner of lot 108A. From the southeast
corner of lot 108A proceed west to the southwest corner of lot 126A. From the
southwest corner of lot 126A proceed north along the west boundary lines to the
northwest corner of lot 94.
For Sherwood Oaks subdivision: Beginning at the southwest corner of lot 1
proceed east along the southern boundary of Sherwood Oaks subdivision to the
southeast corner of lot 64. From the southeast corner of lot 64 proceed north along
the eastern boundary of Sherwood Oaks subdivision to the southeast corner of lot 73.
From the southeast corner of lot 73 proceed east along the southern boundary of
Sherwood Oaks subdivision to the southeast corner of lot 78. From the southeast
corner of lot 78 proceed north along the eastern boundaries of Sherwood Oaks
subdivision to the northeast corner of lot 91. From the northeast corner of lot 91
proceed west along the northern boundary of Sherwood Oaks subdivision to the
northwest corner of lot 210. From the northwest corner of lot 210 proceed south
along the western boundary of Sherwood Oaks subdivision to the southwest corner
of lot 1 starting point of the Sherwood Oaks subdivision.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
C. The purpose of the district shall be to aid in crime prevention, to enhance
security within the district, to provide for an increase in security patrols in the
district, and to provide for the overall betterment of the district.
D.(1) The district shall be governed by a seven-member board of
commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board". The board shall be
composed as follows:
(a) The board of directors of the Parkview Oaks Civic Association, referred
to in this Section as the "association", shall appoint four members.
(b) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives whose district
encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint one
member.
(c) The member of the Louisiana Senate whose district encompasses all or
the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint one member.
(d) The member of the governing authority of East Baton Rouge Parish
whose council district encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the
district shall appoint one member from a list of nominations submitted by the
association.
(2) All members of the board shall own property and reside within the
district and shall be qualified voters of the district.
(3)(a) Members shall serve four-year terms after the initial terms as provided
in this Subparagraph. Two members shall serve an initial term of one year; two shall
serve two years; two shall serve three years, and one shall serve four years, as
determined by lot at the first meeting of the board.
(b) Members shall be eligible for reappointment.
(4) Any vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled in the manner
of the original appointment. If the appointing authority responsible for the
appointment of a member fails to fill a vacancy within thirty days, the remaining
members of the board may appoint an interim successor to serve until the position
is filled by the appointing authority.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
(5) The board shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice chairman, a
secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The duties of
the officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(6) The members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses directly related to the governance
of the district.
(7) The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make them
available through the secretary of the board. The minute books and archives of the
district shall be maintained by the secretary of the board. The monies, funds, and
accounts of the district shall be in the official custody of the board.
(8) The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary
or advisable for conducting its business affairs. The board shall hold regular
meetings as shall be provided for in the bylaws and may hold special meetings at
such times and places within East Baton Rouge Parish as may be prescribed in the
bylaws.
(9) A majority of the membership of the board shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business, and all official action of the board shall require the
favorable vote of a majority of those members present and voting. All members of
the board shall be voting members.
(10) The domicile of the board shall be in East Baton Rouge Parish.
E. The district, acting through its board, shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To sue and be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To receive and expend funds collected pursuant to Subsections F and G
of this Section and in accordance with a budget adopted as provided by Subsection
H of this Section.
(4) To enter into contracts with individuals or entities, private or public.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
(5) To provide or enhance security patrols in the district, to provide for
improved lighting, signage, or matters relating to the security of the district, to
provide for the beautification of and improvement to the district, and to provide
generally for the overall betterment of the district.
(6) To enter into contracts and agreements with one or more other districts
for the joint security, improvement, or betterment of all participating districts.
(7) To provide for such services and make such expenditures as the board
deems proper to carry out the purposes of the district.
(8) To acquire or lease items and supplies which the board deems proper to
carry out the purposes of the district.
(9) To procure and maintain liability insurance against any personal or legal
liability of a board member that may be asserted or incurred based upon service as
a member of the board or that may arise as a result of actions taken within the scope
and discharge of duties as a member of the board.
(10) To perform or have performed any other function or activity necessary
or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the district or for the overall betterment
of the district.
F.(1) The governing authority of the district may impose and collect a parcel
fee within the district subject to and in accordance with the provisions of this
Subsection.
(2)(a) The fee shall be imposed on each improved and unimproved parcel
located within the district.
(b) For purposes of this Section, a parcel shall be defined as a lot, a
subdivided portion of ground, an individual tract, or a "condominium parcel" as
defined in R.S. 9:1121.103. The owner of the parcel shall be responsible for payment
of the fee.
(3) The amount of the fee shall be as provided in a duly adopted resolution
of the board. The fee shall be a flat fee per parcel not to exceed two hundred fifty
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
dollars per year for each parcel; however, the initial fee for the first calendar year
shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars per parcel.
(4) The owner of each parcel shall be responsible for payment of the fee.
(5)(a) The fee shall be imposed only after the question of its imposition has
been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district voting on the
proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. During the term of the fee, the board may increase the fee one time
during each subsequent calendar year, without election, not to exceed ten percent of
the amount of the fee imposed during the previous calendar year; however, the
amount of the fee shall not exceed the maximum amount authorized in Paragraph(3)
of this Subsection. No other election shall be required except as provided in this
Paragraph.
(b) The fee shall expire at the time provided in the proposition authorizing
the fee, not to exceed ten years, but the fee may be renewed if approved by a
majority of the registered voters of the district voting on the proposition at an
election as provided in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph. If the fee is renewed, the
term of the imposition of the fee shall be as provided in the proposition authorizing
the renewal, not to exceed ten years.
(6) The fee shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ad
valorem taxes are collected for East Baton Rouge Parish. The tax collector shall
collect and remit to the district all amounts collected not more than sixty days after
collection; however, the district may enter into an agreement with the tax collector
to authorize retention of an annual collection fee, not to exceed one percent of the
amount collected.
(7) Any parcel fee which is unpaid shall be added to the tax rolls of East
Baton Rouge Parish and shall be enforced with the same authority and subject to the
same penalties and procedures as unpaid ad valorem taxes.
G. The district may solicit, accept, and expend additional voluntary
contributions and grants to carry out the purposes of the district.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
H.(1) The board shall adopt an annual budget in accordance with the
Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et seq.
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
I.(1) It is the purpose and intent of this Section that any additional law
enforcement personnel and services provided for through the fees authorized in this
Section shall be supplemental to, and not in lieu of, personnel and services to be
provided in the district by publicly funded law enforcement agencies.
(2) If the district ceases to exist, any funds, equipment, and property of the
district shall be transmitted to the governing authority of the city of Baton Rouge,
parish of East Baton Rouge and shall be used only within the district for the purposes
set forth in this Section.
J.(1) The district shall indemnify its officers and board members to the
fullest extent permitted by R.S. 12:227, as fully as if the district were a nonprofit
corporation governed thereby, and as may be provided in the district's bylaws.
(2) No board member or officer of the district shall be liable to the district
or to any individual who resides, owns property, visits, or otherwise conducts
business in the district for monetary damages, for breach of his duties as a board
member or officer, provided that this provision shall not eliminate or limit the
liability of a board member or officer for any of the following:
(a) Acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional
misconduct or a knowing violation of law.
(b) Any transaction from which he or she derived an improper personal
benefit.
(3) To the fullest extent permitted by R.S. 9:2792 et seq., including R.S.
9:2792.1 through 2792.9, a person serving the district as a board member or officer
shall not be individually liable for any act or omission arising out of the performance
of his duties.
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 139 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.